Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2193XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 79 Section 1. Section 483A.24, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. Upon payment of a fee established 3 by rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime 4 trapping license, the department shall issue a lifetime 5 trapping license to a resident of Iowa who has served in the 6 armed forces of the United States on federal active duty and 7 who was disabled during that veteranâs military service. The 8 department shall prepare an application to be used by a person 9 requesting a lifetime trapping license under this subsection. 10 The department of veterans affairs shall assist the department 11 in verifying the status or claims of applicants under this 12 subsection. As used in this subsection, âdisabledâ means 13 entitled to a service connected rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 14